src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UUHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tʼahlgúuhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UUHL_STEM_1

     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Sg+Impv: tʼahlgúuhl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Rel: tʼahlgúuhls
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Fut+Long: tʼahlgúuhläsaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Fut+Short: tʼahlgúuhläs
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Simp+Fut: tʼahlgúuhläsaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Imm+Fut: tʼahlgúuhläsga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Rel+Fut: tʼahlgúuhläsaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Fut+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhläsaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼuuj
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Res: tʼahlgúuhläsaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼujaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼuujaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: tʼahlgúuhläsaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Cert+Fut: tʼahlgúuhläsaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: tʼahlgúuhläseehl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Pl+Impv: tʼahlgúuhlʼuu
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Dir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼwägan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Indir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼwägiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼwägaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼwägaangaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäs
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼuuj
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Res: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼujaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cert+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼahlanggan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Ints+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaaʼahlang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Cont: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Rflx: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaʼahl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaaäseehl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: tʼahlgúuhlʼang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Dir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Indir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼangang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼanggaangaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäs
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼuuj
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Res: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼujaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼuujaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cert+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangʼahlanggan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäsaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Ints+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaaʼahlang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Cont: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Rflx: tʼahlgúuhlʼaangʼahl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: tʼahlgúuhlʼangäseehl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼuu
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwägan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwägiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwägaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwägaangaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäs
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaas
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Res: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaʼahl
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: tʼahlgúuhlʼangʼwaaäseehl
